Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5611
Violations; penalties; action for damages; act, how construed.

(1) If the director determines that the reinsurance intermediary or any other person has not materially complied with the Reinsurance Intermediary Act, any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated thereunder, or any order issued thereunder, after notice and opportunity to be heard in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, the director may:

(a) For each separate violation, order a penalty in an amount not exceeding five thousand dollars;

(b) Order revocation or suspension of the reinsurance intermediary's license; and

(c) If it was found that because of such material noncompliance that the insurer or reinsurer has suffered any loss or damage, maintain a civil action brought by or on behalf of the reinsurer or insurer and its policyholders and creditors for recovery of damages for the benefit of the reinsurer or insurer and its policyholders and creditors and other appropriate relief.

(2) If an order of rehabilitation or liquidation of the insurer has been entered pursuant to the Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act, and the receiver appointed under the order determines that the reinsurance intermediary or any other person has not materially complied with the Reinsurance Intermediary Act, any rule and regulation adopted and promulgated thereunder, or any order issued thereunder, and the insurer suffered any loss or damage therefrom, the receiver may maintain a civil action for recovery of damages and other appropriate relief for the benefit of the insurer.

(3) This section shall not affect the right of the director to impose any other penalties provided for in Chapter 44.

(4) The Reinsurance Intermediary Act is not intended to and shall not in any manner limit or restrict the rights of policyholders, claimants, creditors, and other third parties.

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 65;

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 113.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.

Nebraska Insurers Supervision, Rehabilitation, and Liquidation Act, see section 44-4862.